Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.400.206

Cost-of-living increases—Duty of state.

The Washington Constitution establishes "the paramount duty of the state to make ample provision for the education of all children." Providing quality education for all children in Washington requires well-qualified and experienced teachers and other school employees. However, salaries for educators have not kept up with the increased cost-of-living in the state. The failure to keep up with inflation threatens Washington's ability to compete with other states to attract first-rate teachers to Washington classrooms and to keep well-qualified educators from leaving for other professions. The state must provide a fair and reasonable cost-of-living increase, as provided in chapter 20, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess., to help ensure that the state attracts and keeps the best teachers and school employees for the children of Washington.

[ 2003 1st sp.s. c 20 s 2; 2001 c 4 s 1 (Initiative Measure No. 732, approved November 7, 2000).]

NOTES:

Severability—2001 c 4 (Initiative Measure No. 732): See note following RCW 28A.400.205.